Utah statutes.
76-6-206.3.   Criminal trespass on agricultural land or range land.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Agricultural or range land" and "land" mean land as defined under
Subsections (1)(d) and (e).
(b)  "Authorization" means specific written permission by, or contractual
agreement with, the owner or manager of the property.
(c)  "Criminal trespass" means the elements of the crime of criminal trespass
under Section 76-6-206.
(d)  "Land in agricultural use" has the same meaning as in Section 59-2-502.
(e)  "Range land" means privately owned land that is not fenced or divided
into lots and that is generally unimproved.  This land includes land used for
livestock.
(2)  A person is guilty of the class B misdemeanor criminal offense of
criminal trespass on agricultural or range land and is liable for the civil
damages under Subsection (5) if, under circumstances not amounting to a
greater offense, and without authorization or a right under state law, the
person enters or remains on agricultural or range land regarding which notice
prohibiting entry is given by:
(a)  personal communication to the person by the owner of the land, an
employee of the owner, or a person with apparent authority to act for the
owner;
(b)  fencing or other form of enclosure a reasonable person would recognize as
intended to exclude intruders; or
(c)  posted signs or markers that would reasonably be expected to be seen by
persons in the area of the borders of the land.
(3)  A person is guilty of the class B misdemeanor criminal offense of
cutting, destroying, or rendering ineffective the fencing of agricultural or
range land if the person willfully cuts, destroys, or renders ineffective any
fencing as described under Subsection (2)(b).
(4)  In addition to restitution, as provided in Section 76-3-201, a person who
commits any violation of Subsection (2) or (3) may also be liable for:
(a)  statutory damages in the amount of the value of damages resulting from
the violation of Subsection (2) or $500, whichever is greater; and
(b)  reasonable attorney fees not to exceed $250, and court costs.
(5)  Civil damages under Subsection (4) may be collected in a separate action
by the owner of the agricultural or range land or the owner's assignee.
